District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5711

Exemption of benefits from legal process.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1314, ch. 854, § 759
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(a), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1211.
1973 Ed., § 35-911.